Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-1108] Effective date of the
merger. A merger takes effect upon the filing date of the
articles of merger, or on the date subsequent to the filing as set forth in the
articles of merger; provided that the effective date shall not be more than
thirty days from the filing date. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next